West Virginia, session 2025, SB449.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-46. Air rifles and rimfire rifles permitted for school teams. (a) Legislative intent. — The popularity of air rifle and rimfire rifle teams are expanding in the state and across the country. Current code is unclear as to the legality of these rifles to be permitted on school grounds. For that reason, definitions are needed, and enactment should be carried out to ensure the support and continuation of such clubs.(b) Definitions. — The following definitions apply to this section:(1) "Air rifle" or "compressed air rifle" means a rifle, gun, or other firearm that uses compressed air or gas to propel projectiles, such as pellets, rather than relying on the explosive force of gunpowder like traditional firearms.(2) "Rimfire rifle" means a firearm that uses rimfire ammunition, which is a type of metallic cartridge with a primer in the rim of the casing, wherein the firing pin strikes the rim, igniting the primer and propelling the bullet down the barrel. (c) Enactment. — Air rifles and rimfire rifles are permitted on school buses solely during transportation to or from a school-sponsored shooting team event; on the grounds of any primary or secondary educational facility of any type for shooting team purposes; and at a school-sponsored shooting team function that is taking place in a specific area that is owned, rented, or leased by the West Virginia Department of Education, the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission, a county school board, or local public school: Provided, That during the school day or at any time other than school-sponsored team events or practices, the air rifles and rimfire rifles and ammunition shall be locked in a location where students do not have access: Provided further, That air rifles and rimfire rifles and ammunition stored on school buses shall be placed in a locked case and located in a specific location that is determined by state transportation director or the county transportation director. CHAPTER 61. CRIMES AND THEIR PUNISHMENT. ARTICLE 7. DANGEROUS WEAPONS. §61-7-11a. Possessing deadly weapons on premises of educational facilities; reports by school principals; suspension of driver’s license; possessing deadly weapons on premises housing courts of law and family law courts. (a) The Legislature finds that the safety and welfare of the citizens of this state are inextricably dependent upon assurances of safety for children attending and persons employed by schools in this state and for persons employed by the judicial department of this state. It is for the purpose of providing assurances of safety that §61-7-11a(b), §61-7-11a(g), §61-7-11a(h), and §61-7-11a(b)(2)(I) of this code are enacted as a reasonable regulation of the manner in which citizens may exercise the rights accorded to them pursuant to section 22, article III of the Constitution of the State of West Virginia.(b) (1) It is unlawful to possess a firearm or other deadly weapon:(A) On a school bus as defined in §17A-1-1 of this code;(B) In or on the grounds of any primary or secondary educational facility of any type: Provided, That it shall not be unlawful to possess a firearm or other deadly weapon in or on the grounds of any private primary or secondary school, if such institution has adopted a written policy allowing for possession of firearms or other deadly weapons in the facility or on the grounds of the facility; or(C) At a school-sponsored function that is taking place in a specific area that is owned, rented, or leased by the West Virginia Department of Education, the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission, a county school board, or local public school for the actual period of time the function is occurring.(2) This subsection does not apply to:(A) A law-enforcement officer employed by a federal, state, county, or municipal law- enforcement agency;(B) Any probation officer appointed pursuant to §62-12-5 of this code or state juvenile probation officer appointed pursuant to §49-4-719 of this code, in the performance of his or her duties;(C) Any home confinement supervisor employed by a county commission pursuant to §61-11B-7a of this code in the performance of his or her duties;(D) A state parole officer appointed pursuant to §15A-7-5 of this code, while in performance of his or her official duties;(E) A retired law-enforcement officer who meets all the requirements to carry a firearm as a qualified retired law-enforcement officer under the Law-Enforcement Officer Safety Act of 2004, as amended, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 926C(c), carries that firearm in a concealed manner, and has on his or her person official identification in accordance with that act;(F) A person, other than a student of a primary and secondary facility, specifically authorized by the board of education of the county or principal of the school where the property is located to conduct programs with valid educational purposes;(G) A person who, as otherwise permitted by the provisions of this article, possesses an unloaded firearm or deadly weapon in a motor vehicle or leaves an unloaded firearm or deadly weapon in a locked motor vehicle;(H) Programs or raffles conducted with the approval of the county board of education or school which include the display of unloaded firearms;(I)  Air rifles and rimfire rifles possessed for the purpose of shooting teams to the extent permitted pursuant to §18-2-46; (J) The official mascot of West Virginia University, commonly known as the Mountaineer, acting in his or her official capacity; (K) The official mascot of Parkersburg South High School, commonly known as the Patriot, acting in his or her official capacity; or(L) Any person, 21 years old or older, who has a valid concealed handgun permit. That person may possess a concealed handgun while in a motor vehicle in a parking lot, traffic circle, or other areas of vehicular ingress or egress to a public school: Provided, That:(i) When he or she is occupying the vehicle, the person stores the handgun out of view from persons outside the vehicle; or(ii) When he or she is not occupying the vehicle, the person stores the handgun out of view from persons outside the vehicle, the vehicle is locked, and the handgun is in a glove box or other interior compartment, or in a locked trunk, or in a locked container securely fixed to the vehicle. (3) A person violating this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a definite term of years of not less than two years nor more than 10 years, or fined not more than $5,000, or both fined and imprisoned.(c) A school principal subject to the authority of the State Board of Education who discovers a violation of §61-7-11a(b) of this code shall report the violation as soon as possible to:(1) The State Superintendent of Schools. The State Board of Education shall keep and maintain these reports and may prescribe rules establishing policy and procedures for making and delivering the reports as required by this subsection; and(2) The appropriate local office of the State Police, county sheriff, or municipal police agency.(d) In addition to the methods of disposition provided by §49-5-1 et seq. of this code, a court which adjudicates a person who is 14 years of age or older as delinquent for a violation of §61-7-11a(b) of this code, may order the Division of Motor Vehicles to suspend a driver’s license or instruction permit issued to the person for a period of time as the court considers appropriate, not to extend beyond the person’s 19th birthday. If the person has not been issued a driver’s license or instruction permit by this state, a court may order the Division of Motor Vehicles to deny the person’s application for a license or permit for a period of time as the court considers appropriate, not to extend beyond the person’s 19th birthday. A suspension ordered by the court pursuant to this subsection is effective upon the date of entry of the order. Where the court orders the suspension of a driver’s license or instruction permit pursuant to this subsection, the court shall confiscate any driver’s license or instruction permit in the adjudicated person’s possession and forward it to the Division of Motor Vehicles.(e)(1) If a person 18 years of age or older is convicted of violating §61-7-11a(b) of this code, and if the person does not act to appeal the conviction within the time periods described in §61-7-11a(e)(2) of this code, the person’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state shall be revoked in accordance with the provisions of this section.(2) The clerk of the court in which the person is convicted as described in §61-7-11a(e)(1) of this code shall forward to the commissioner a transcript of the judgment of conviction. If the conviction is the judgment of a magistrate court, the magistrate court clerk shall forward the transcript when the person convicted has not requested an appeal within 20 days of the sentencing for the conviction. If the conviction is the judgment of a circuit court, the circuit clerk shall forward a transcript of the judgment of conviction when the person convicted has not filed a notice of intent to file a petition for appeal or writ of error within 30 days after the judgment was entered.(3) If, upon examination of the transcript of the judgment of conviction, the commissioner determines that the person was convicted as described in §61-7-11a(e)(1) of this code, the commissioner shall make and enter an order revoking the person’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state for a period of one year or, in the event the person is a student enrolled in a secondary school, for a period of one year or until the person’s 20th  birthday, whichever is the greater period. The order shall contain the reasons for the revocation and the revocation period. The order of suspension shall advise the person that because of the receipt of the court’s transcript, a presumption exists that the person named in the order of suspension is the same person named in the transcript. The commissioner may grant an administrative hearing which substantially complies with the requirements of the provisions of §17C-5A-2 of this code upon a preliminary showing that a possibility exists that the person named in the notice of conviction is not the same person whose license is being suspended. The request for hearing shall be made within 10 days after receipt of a copy of the order of suspension. The sole purpose of this hearing is for the person requesting the hearing to present evidence that he or she is not the person named in the notice. If the commissioner grants an administrative hearing, the commissioner shall stay the license suspension pending the commissioner’s order resulting from the hearing.(4) For the purposes of this subsection, a person is convicted when he or she enters a plea of guilty or is found guilty by a court or jury.(f)(1) It is unlawful for a parent, guardian, or custodian of a person less than 18 years of age who knows that the person is in violation of §61-7-11a(b) of this code or has reasonable cause to believe that the person’s violation of §61-7-11a(b) of this code is imminent to fail to immediately report his or her knowledge or belief to the appropriate school or law-enforcement officials.(2) A person violating this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000, or shall be confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined.(g)(1) It is unlawful for a person to possess a firearm or other deadly weapon on the premises of a court of law, including family courts.(2) This subsection does not apply to:(A) A law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity; and(B) A person exempted from the provisions of this subsection by order of record entered by a court with jurisdiction over the premises or offices.(3) A person violating this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000, or shall be confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined.(h)(1) It is unlawful for a person to possess a firearm or other deadly weapon on the premises of a court of law, including family courts, with the intent to commit a crime.(2) A person violating this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a definite term of years of not less than two years nor more than 10 years, or fined not more than $5,000, or both fined and imprisoned.(i) Nothing in this section may be construed to be in conflict with the provisions of federal law. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home